Utah statutes.
73-18-18.   Liability of owner for injury or damage occasioned by negligent operation of vessel by minor.

The owner of a vessel shall be liable for any injury or damage occasioned by the negligent operation of such vessel, by a minor under the age of 18 years operating such vessel with the express or implied consent of the owner, whether under the laws of this state or by neglecting to observe such ordinary care and such operation as the rules of common law require.

